Oklahoma, session 2026, SB664.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1000.4a, as


amended by Section 3, Chapter 185, O.S.L. 2023 (59 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 1000.4a), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1000.4a. A. The Construction Industries Board shall


have the additional powers to:


1. Receive and convey information relating to the skilled


trades regulated by the Construction Industries Board including, but


not limited to, workforce development; and


2. Enter into contracts with the Oklahoma Department of Career


and Technology Education or any Oklahoma State Board of Career and

Req. No. 671 Page 1


Technology Education fully accredited vocational or technical


school, or any accredited system of education institution in the


State of Oklahoma this state receiving state appropriations and


offering programs in primary, secondary and, or postsecondary


instruction that provide electrical, mechanical, plumbing or roofing


trade coursework for any of the following purposes, or combination


thereof:


a. developing and implementing instructional courses on


Oklahoma Statutes and rules that govern the


electrical, mechanical, plumbing and roofing trades,


which courses can be in conjunction with instruction


in performing trade work or instruction on statewide-


adopted trade codes, or both, for the advancement of


the electrical, mechanical, plumbing and roofing


trades, or


b. developing and implementing a workforce development


program that will create interest in the pursuit of a


skilled trade career and public awareness. The


workforce development program may consist of, but is


not limited to, use of the Internet, community and


school presentations, and research and instruction on


the electrical, mechanical, plumbing and roofing


trades, and public information campaigns.



Req. No. 671 Page 2


B. All contracts pursuant to this section shall be approved by


the Construction Industries Board in accordance with the Oklahoma


Open Meeting Act. Costs of the contracts for education and


workforce development programs shall be paid from the Skilled Trade


Education and Workforce Development Fund established herein and


funded by administrative fines or penalties as described in this


section. Applications for proposals are to be submitted to the


Board on forms provided requiring sufficient justification and


information to evaluate costs, return on investment, value, and


viability of the proposal. Any contracts will include the


requirement that the recipient of the funds will, upon the


completion of the contract, provide a written report to the Board


providing an accounting of expenditures, describing an explanation


of the funds used for the services provided and the success of


outreach demonstrating a return on the investment including, but not


limited to, an accounting of accomplishments.


C. Fines or penalties collected by the Board and deposited in


the Oklahoma Mechanical Licensing Revolving Fund, the Electrical


Revolving Fund, the Plumbing Licensing Revolving Fund and the


Roofing Contractor Registration Revolving Fund may be transferred to


the Skilled Trade Education and Workforce Development Fund created


in subsection E of this section for the following purposes:





Req. No. 671 Page 3


1. To develop instructional materials on Oklahoma laws,


statutes and rules, as they relate to the plumbing, mechanical,


electrical and roofing trades and state licensing standards;


2. To cover the cost of equipment, materials, personnel and any


other costs of developing and implementing the trade curriculum; and


3. To cover the cost of equipment, materials, personnel and any


other costs of developing and implementing the workforce development


program used to promote the plumbing, mechanical, electrical and


roofing trades as a career in Oklahoma.


D. The Skilled Trade Education and Workforce Development Fund


monies shall be used only for the advancement of trade-related


education and workforce development, and only if available based


upon statutory limitations.


E. 1. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a


revolving fund for the Construction Industries Board to be


designated the “Skilled Trade Education and Workforce Development


Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal


year limitations. The fund shall consist of an annual transfer of


fully adjudicated fine revenue received in the Oklahoma Mechanical


Licensing Revolving Fund, Electrical Revolving Fund, Plumbing


Licensing Revolving Fund or Roofing Contractor Registration


Revolving Fund as determined pursuant to this section. Funds may be


transferred only from the prior fiscal year.



Req. No. 671 Page 4


2. If actual receipts, not including fine receipts, exceed


actual expenses and outstanding encumbrances, then one hundred


percent (100%) of all fully adjudicated fine revenue received shall


be transferred from each specific trade revolving fund: the


Oklahoma Mechanical Licensing Revolving Fund, Electrical Revolving


Fund, Plumbing Licensing Revolving Fund or Roofing Contractor


Registration Revolving Fund.


3. If at any time the receipts in the Oklahoma Mechanical


Licensing Revolving Fund, Electrical Revolving Fund, Plumbing


Licensing Revolving Fund or Roofing Contractor Registration


Revolving Fund, not including fine receipts, are less than actual


expenses and outstanding encumbrances, then the difference of fine


receipts over actual expenses and outstanding encumbrances, if any,


shall be transferred.


4. If at any time the annual receipts in the Oklahoma


Mechanical Licensing Revolving Fund, Electrical Revolving Fund,


Plumbing Licensing Revolving Fund or Roofing Contractor Registration


Revolving Fund, including fine receipts, are less than the actual


expenses and outstanding encumbrances, there shall be no transfer of


funds for that period.


5. All monies accruing to the credit of the Skilled Trade


Education and Workforce Development Fund may be budgeted and


expended by the Construction Industries Board for workforce


development as it relates to the skilled trades and to contract for

Req. No. 671 Page 5


the services identified in this act section and Sections 1018,


1151.20, 1694, and 1850.13 of this title. Expenditures from the


fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer


against claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the


Office of Management and Enterprise Services for approval and


payment.


6. All unexpended or outstanding funds from the Skilled Trade


Education and Workforce Development Funds Fund from any written


agreement where work or services have not been previously approved


by specific quote or cost estimate and have not been performed


within eighteen (18) months of the date the agreement was signed are


hereby released from the agreement and are available for future


agreements approved by the Board pursuant to this act section and


Sections 1000.2 and 1000.4 of this title, except for specific


quotes, estimates, or invoices that previously have been approved


for payment, and for which performance has been initiated, and


completed within twenty-four (24) months of the signed agreement.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-671 CAD 1/19/2025 5:40:58 AM









Req. No. 671 Page 6